District of Columbia statutes.
16-1317

Objections to jurors; appraisement.

The court, before accepting the jury in a condemnation proceeding pursuant to this subchapter, shall hear any objections that may be made to any member thereof, and may pass upon any objection, and may excuse any juror or cause any vacancy in the jury, when empaneled, to be filled. After the jury is organized and have viewed and examined the land and premises affected by the condemnation proceeding, they shall proceed, in the presence of the court, to hear and receive any evidence offered or submitted on behalf of the District of Columbia and by any person having an interest in the proceeding. When the hearing is concluded, the jury, or a majority of them, shall return to the court, in writing, their appraisement of the value of the interests of all persons, respectively, in the real property, where the appraisement shall be recorded. In making their decision, the jury shall take into consideration, when a part only is taken, the benefit to the remainder of the tract, and shall give their appraisement accordingly.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
This section is referenced in § 16-1318 and § 16-1319.
1981 Ed., § 16-1317.
1973 Ed., § 16-1317.